Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.100

Commission—Officers—Meetings.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The *commission shall annually elect officers from among its members. The *commission shall meet at least quarterly at times and places it designates. It shall hold such other meetings during the year as may be deemed necessary to transact its business. A majority of the *commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum at a meeting. All meetings of the *commission must be open and public, except that the *commission may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.

Carrying a motion or resolution, adopting a rule, or passing a measure requires the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the *commission. The *commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the *commission.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 410.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.